Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; YOUTH INTERVENTION PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin (a) $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for youth intervention program supplemental grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.43. Of this amount, the commissioner may use up to ten percent for administrative costs. Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.43, subdivisions 2 and 3, do not apply to supplemental grants under this section. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Supplemental grants issued under this section may not exceed $50,000 per grantee. new text end new text begin (c) Only existing youth intervention program grantees from the most recent grant cycle are eligible for supplemental grants under this section. In a time and manner prescribed by the commissioner, eligible grantees must submit a work plan that describes immediate or emerging needs for early interventions to address trauma experienced by the youth the grantees serve. new text end